Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3201
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 29-3201 to 29-3210,

(a) Witness means a person who is confined in a penal institution in any state and whose testimony is desired in another state in any criminal proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in any criminal action before a court.

(b) Penal institutions includes a jail, prison, penitentiary, house of correction, or other place of penal detention.

(c) State includes any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory of the United States.

Laws 1969, c. 229, § 1, p. 854.